Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2911
Political subdivision; loan; application; terms.

(1) Any political subdivision may apply to the department for a loan from the investment program on a form prescribed by the department.

(2) The terms of a duly executed loan or assistance contract are binding on the borrower, and the borrower shall unconditionally repay from pledged sources.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 11.
July 18, 2026